Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska7-110
Parties acting in their own behalf.

Plaintiffs shall have the liberty of prosecuting, and defendants shall have the liberty of defending, in their proper persons.

R.S.1866, c. 3, § 10, p. 16;

R.S.1913, § 274;

C.S.1922, § 269;

C.S.1929, § 7-110;

R.S.1943, § 7-110.

An individual assignee of a corporation's or other distinct legal entity's cause of action cannot bring such action pro se. Zapata v. McHugh, 296 Neb. 216, 893 N.W.2d 720 (2017).

In absence of unusual circumstances, defendant who is sui juris and mentally competent has right to conduct his defense in person without assistance of counsel. State v. Beasley, 183 Neb. 681, 163 N.W.2d 783 (1969).

Plaintiffs have the liberty of prosecuting, and defendants have the liberty of defending, in their own proper persons without the assistance of an attorney. Weiner v. Schrempp, 177 Neb. 583, 129 N.W.2d 518 (1964).

Disbarred attorney could not prosecute representative action in his own name. Niklaus v. Abel Construction Co., 164 Neb. 842, 83 N.W.2d 904 (1957).

Party to suit may act as his own attorney. Vielehr v. Malone, 158 Neb. 436, 63 N.W.2d 497 (1954).